lexc/adj/enhuadj1.lexc
! enhuadj1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ @U.ART.ABSENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Mid
+Ik
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoezmid§ §oeoez1e§ §oeoez11e§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoebb§ §oeoez5§ §oeoezoe§
§oeoez11§ §OEOE11§
§oeoez2oe§ §EOAoe§ §ooez3oe§ §OEOE1oe§ §OEOEoe§ 
§OEOE4a§
 

LEXICON Root
   Prefleg ;
   Prefnum;
   Prefnum1;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj ; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:tizen       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszon       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj2; ! empty string entry
LEXICON Prefnum1
+Pref+:száz       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kétszáz       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:háromszáz    Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:négyszáz       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötszáz      Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatszáz       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hétszáz       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcszáz       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencszáz      Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Adj2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Adj3; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kétszáz       Adj3; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:háromszáz    Adj3; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:négyszáz       Adj3; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötszáz      Adj3; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatszáz       Adj3; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hétszáz       Adj3; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcszáz       Adj3; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencszáz      Adj3; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Adj3; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj2; ! empty string entry
                        Adj3; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Adj2
egyedik AddAdj;
kettedik AddAdj;
negyedik AddAdj;
ötödik AddAdjoe;
hetedik AddAdj;
kilencedik AddAdj;

LEXICON Adj3
tizedik AddAdj;


LEXICON Adj
ahányadik AddAdj;
akárhányadik AddAdj;
akármennyiedik AddAdj;
amennyiedik AddAdj;
bárhányadik AddAdj;
bármennyiedik AddAdj;
egyvalamelyik AddAdj;
első AddAdj;
emennyiedik AddAdj;
ennyiedik AddAdj;
ezredik AddAdj;
fekete AddAdj;
gyors AddAdjat;
gyors AddAdjatot;
hasas AddAdjat;
hetvenedik AddAdj;
ilyesvalahányadik AddAdj;
ilyesvalamennyiedik AddAdj;
kajla AddAdj;
kedves AddAdjat;   
kilencvenedik AddAdj;
körkörös AddAdjoe;
mennyiedik AddAdj;
másvalahányadik AddAdj;
másvalamennyiedik AddAdj;
nagyratörő AddAdj; ! test this
negyvenedik AddAdj;
olyasvalahányadik AddAdj;
olyasvalamelyik AddAdj;
olyasvalamennyiedik AddAdj;
sehányadik AddAdj;
semennyiedik AddAdj;
sokadik AddAdj;
százezredik AddAdj;
tízezredik AddAdj;
valahányadik AddAdj;
valamennyiedik AddAdj;
ötvenedik AddAdjoe;


! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdj
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocase;

LEXICON AddAdjoe
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1oe;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseoe;


Lexicon Tocase1oe
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possoeik;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Pluroeik;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famoeik;

Lexicon Tocase1
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Poss1;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plur1;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Fam1;

Lexicon Tocaseoe
[stem]+Adj:0     Possoe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluroe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famoe;

Lexicon Tocase
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Poss1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1;

LEXICON Possoe
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3oe§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOAoe§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famoe;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1oe§m   Famoe;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famoe;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1oe§d   Famoe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famoe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famoe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1oe§t§OEOEoe§k   Famoe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famoe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famoe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famoe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famoe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famoe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famoe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famoe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famoe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Possoeik
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3oe§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOAoe§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famoe;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1oe§m   Famoe;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famoe;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1oe§d   Famoe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famoe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famoe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1oe§t§OEOEoe§k   Famoe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famoe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famoe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famoe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famoe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famoe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famoe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famoe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famoe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famoeik;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen;

LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen1;

LEXICON Pluroe
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genoe;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez5§k    Genoe;
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1oe§k    Genoe;
                            Genoe;
LEXICON Pluroeik
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genoe;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez5§k    Genoe;
                            Genoeik1;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;
LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Famoe
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genoe;
                       Genoe;
LEXICON Famoeik
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genoe;
                       Genoeik1;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;

LEXICON Genoe
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseoe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseoe;
                       Caseoe;

LEXICON Genoeik1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseoe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseoe;
                       Caseoe1;

LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Caseoe
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2oe§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
